Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 7.1 Libel of a Deceased Person

10-7.1-1.
Liability for damages for libel of a deceased person.

Whenever a deceased person shall have been slandered or libelled in an obituary or similar account in any newspaper or on any radio or television station within three (3) months of his or her date of death, and the account would, if death had not ensued, have entitled the party injured to maintain an action and recover damages in respect to the libel, the person who or corporation which would have been liable if death had not ensued shall be liable to an action for damages, notwithstanding the death of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 82, § 1.

10-7.1-2.
Action by executor or administrator — Persons benefited — Limitation of action.

Every action under this chapter shall be brought by and in the name of the executor or administrator of the deceased person, whether appointed or qualified within or without the state, and of the amount recovered in every action under this chapter one-half (1/2) shall go to the husband or widow, and one-half (1/2) shall go to the children of the deceased, and if there are no children the whole shall go to the husband or widow, and, if there is no husband or widow, to the next of kin, in the proportion provided by law in relation to the distribution of personal property left by persons dying intestate. Provided, that every action under this chapter shall be commenced within one year after the death of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 31.

10-7.1-3.
Action by beneficiaries.

If there is no executor or administrator, or if, there being one, no action is brought in his or her name within six (6) months after the death, one action may be brought in the names of all the beneficiaries, either by all, or by part stating that they sue for the benefit of all, and stating their respective relations to the deceased; provided, that if all do not bring suit, only those bringing it shall be responsible for costs; but judgment shall be for the benefit of all and shall be entered as several judgments for each in his or her proportion as aforesaid, and executions thereon shall issue in favor of each respectively: provided, further, that if action be brought by the beneficiaries, no action shall thereafter be brought by the executor or administrator. There shall be but one bill of costs in favor of the plaintiffs, which shall enure equally for the benefit of those bringing the suit, and of them only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 82, § 1.

10-7.1-4.
Cause surviving death of person liable.

Any cause of action arising under §§

10-7.1-1

—

10-7.1-4

and any action authorized by this chapter shall survive the death of any person liable for damages under this chapter, and may be originally brought against his or her executor or administrator or, if brought against the person in his or her lifetime, may in the event of his or her death be defended by his or her executor or administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 31.

10-7.1-5.
Damages not to estate or asset of estate.

All damages recoverable under §§

10-7.1-1

—

10-7.1-4

shall be recoverable by and awarded to those beneficiaries as specified in §

10-7.1-2

and shall not be deemed or considered damages to the estate of the decedent, nor shall they be considered in any way an asset of the estate of the decedent, nor liable to any claims against the estate of the decedent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 82, § 1.